Maryland, session 2026, HB1012.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Health – General
SUBTITLE 11. LOCAL SUICIDE FATALITY REVIEW TEAMS.
5–1101.
(A) IN THIS SUBTITLE, “LOCAL THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE
MEANINGS INDICATED.
(B) “LOCAL TEAM” MEANS A MULTIDISCIPLINARY AND MULTIAGENCY
SUICIDE FATALITY REVIEW TEAM ESTABLISHED UNDER § 5–1102 § 5–1103 OF THIS
SUBTITLE.
– 1 –

Ch. 328 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(C) “STATE TEAM” MEANS THE MARYLAND SUICIDE FATALITY REVIEW
COMMITTEE.
15–1102.
THIS SUBTITLE MAY NOT BE CONSTRUED TO SUPERSEDE, LIMIT, INTERFERE
WITH, OR OTHERWISE AFFECT THE AUTHORITY OR DUTIES OF A LOCAL CHILD
FATALITY REVIEW TEAM UNDER SUBTITLE 7 OF THIS TITLE.
5–1102. 5–1103.
(A) SUBJECT TO SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION, A COUNTY OR
MUNICIPALITY MAY ESTABLISH A MULTIDISCIPLINARY AND MULTIAGENCY SUICIDE
FATALITY REVIEW TEAM.
(B) TWO OR MORE COUNTIES MAY ESTABLISH A SINGLE MULTICOUNTY
LOCAL TEAM.
(C) A MULTICOUNTY LOCAL TEAM SHALL EXECUTE A MEMORANDUM OF
UNDERSTANDING ON MEMBERSHIP, STAFFING, AND OPERATION.
(D) THE LOCAL TEAM MEMBERSHIP SHALL BE DRAWN, IF AVAILABLE, FROM
THE FOLLOWING INDIVIDUALS, ORGANIZATIONS, AGENCIES, AND AREAS OF
EXPERTISE:
(1) THE COUNTY HEALTH OFFICER, OR THE OFFICER’S DESIGNEE;
(2) THE DIRECTOR OF THE LOCAL DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL
SERVICES, OR THE DIRECTOR’S DESIGNEE;
(3) THE DIRECTOR OF THE LOCAL BEHAVIORAL HEALTH AUTHORITY
OR THE DIRECTOR’S DESIGNEE;
(4) THE SUPERINTENDENT OF SCHOOLS FOR THE COUNTY, OR THE
SUPERINTENDENT’S DESIGNEE;
(5) A STATE, COUNTY, OR MUNICIPAL LAW ENFORCEMENT OFFICER;
(6) THE DIRECTOR OF BEHAVIORAL HEALTH SERVICES IN THE
COUNTY, OR THE DIRECTOR’S DESIGNEE;
(7) AN EMERGENCY MEDICAL SERVICES PROVIDER IN THE COUNTY;
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 328
(8) A REPRESENTATIVE OF A HOSPITAL;
(9) A HEALTH CARE PROFESSIONAL WHO SPECIALIZES IN THE
PREVENTION, DIAGNOSIS, AND TREATMENT OF MENTAL HEALTH OR BEHAVIORAL
HEALTH CONDITIONS;
(10) A MEMBER OF THE PUBLIC WITH INTEREST OR EXPERTISE IN
SUICIDE PREVENTION, APPOINTED BY THE COUNTY HEALTH OFFICER; AND
(11) ANY OTHER INDIVIDUAL NECESSARY FOR THE WORK OF THE
LOCAL TEAM, RECOMMENDED BY THE LOCAL TEAM AND APPOINTED BY THE COUNTY
HEALTH OFFICER.
(E) EACH LOCAL TEAM SHALL ELECT A CHAIR FROM AMONG ITS MEMBERS.
(F) EACH LOCAL TEAM SHALL:
(1) MEET AT LEAST QUARTERLY TO:
(I) REVIEW THE STATUS OF SUICIDE FATALITY CASES;
(II) RECOMMEND ACTIONS TO IMPROVE THE COORDINATION OF
SERVICES AND INVESTIGATIONS AMONG AGENCIES; AND
(III) RECOMMEND ACTIONS TO RELEVANT AGENCIES TO
PREVENT SUICIDE DEATHS;
(2) COLLECT AND MAINTAIN DATA AS REQUIRED BY THE STATE
TEAM;
(3) ENSURE SAFE AND SECURE STORAGE FOR PROTECTED
INFORMATION AND RECORDS HELD BY THE LOCAL TEAM;
(4) PROVIDE ANY REPORTS REQUIRED BY THE STATE TEAM,
INCLUDING:
(I) REPORTS ON INDIVIDUAL CASES;
(II) STEPS TAKEN TO IMPROVE COORDINATION OF SERVICES
AND INVESTIGATIONS AMONG AGENCIES;
(III) STEPS TAKEN TO IMPLEMENT THE RECOMMENDATIONS OF
LOCAL TEAMS BY APPLICABLE AGENCIES; AND
– 3 –

Ch. 328 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(IV) RECOMMENDATIONS FOR CHANGES TO STATE AND LOCAL
LAW, POLICY, AND PRACTICES DESIGNED TO PREVENT SUICIDE DEATHS;
(5) SUBJECT TO § 5–1104(C) OF THIS SUBTITLE, COORDINATE WITH
LOCAL CHILD FATALITY REVIEW TEAMS, AND LOCAL DRUG OVERDOSE FATALITY
REVIEW TEAMS TO ENSURE THE EFFICIENCY OF EACH LOCAL TEAM’S OPERATIONS;
(6) COORDINATE WITH THE STATE SUICIDE FATALITY REVIEW
COMMITTEE ESTABLISHED UNDER SUBTITLE 10 OF THIS TITLE, INCLUDING TO
ESTABLISH OPERATING PROTOCOLS; AND
(2) (7) OPERATE SUBJECT TO STATE AND NATIONAL STANDARDS,
AND SUBJECT TO GUIDANCE ISSUED BY THE STATE SUICIDE FATALITY REVIEW
COMMITTEE.
5–1103. 5–1104.
(A) THE PURPOSE OF A LOCAL TEAM IS TO PREVENT SUICIDE DEATHS BY:
(1) REVIEWING SUICIDE DEATHS OF RESIDENTS OF THE COUNTY OR
THAT OCCUR WITHIN THE COUNTY;
(2) IDENTIFYING SYSTEMIC, SERVICE, AND POLICY FACTORS
ASSOCIATED WITH RISK OF SUICIDE;
(3) PROMOTING COORDINATION BETWEEN ENTITIES INVOLVED IN
SUICIDE PREVENTION, CRISIS RESPONSE, TREATMENT, AND POSTVENTION; AND
(4) DEVELOPING RECOMMENDATIONS TO PREVENT SUICIDE.
(B) A LOCAL TEAM MAY:
(1) EXAMINE TRENDS IN SUICIDE AND FACTORS THAT CONTRIBUTE
TO SUICIDE RISK;
(2) SHARE INFORMATION WITH OTHER PUBLIC HEALTH
AUTHORITIES OR THEIR DESIGNEES AS THE LOCAL TEAM DETERMINES NECESSARY
TO CARRY OUT THE PURPOSES OF THIS SUBTITLE;
(3) IDENTIFY GAPS IN SYSTEMS OF CARE OR COORDINATION
BETWEEN ENTITIES INVOLVED IN SUICIDE PREVENTION, CRISIS RESPONSE,
TREATMENT, AND POSTVENTION; AND
– 4 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 328
(3) (4) SUBMIT RECOMMENDATIONS TO THE STATE SUICIDE
FATALITY REVIEW COMMITTEE ESTABLISHED UNDER SUBTITLE 10 OF THIS TITLE,
OR OTHER LOCAL ENTITIES AS DETERMINED APPROPRIATE BY THE LOCAL TEAM.
(C) A LOCAL CHILD FATALITY REVIEW TEAM:
(1) FOR A SUICIDE DEATH INVOLVING AN INDIVIDUAL UNDER THE
AGE OF 18 YEARS, SHALL RETAIN THE PRIMARY AUTHORITY TO CONDUCT THE
REVIEW IN ACCORDANCE WITH SUBTITLE 7 OF THIS TITLE; AND
(2) MAY COORDINATE OR CONDUCT A JOINT REVIEW WITH THE
LOCAL TEAM.
5–1104. 5–1105.
A PERSON SHALL HAVE THE IMMUNITY FROM LIABILITY UNDER § 5–637 OF
THE COURTS ARTICLE FOR ANY ACTION AS A MEMBER OF THE LOCAL TEAM FOR
GIVING INFORMATION TO, PARTICIPATING IN, OR CONTRIBUTING TO THE FUNCTION
OF THE LOCAL TEAM.
5–1106.
(A) A LOCAL TEAM MAY REQUEST RECORDS UNDER THIS SECTION UNDER
THE AUTHORITY OF THE STATE TEAM.
(B) ON REQUEST OF THE CHAIR OF A LOCAL TEAM AND AS NECESSARY TO
CARRY OUT THE PURPOSE AND DUTIES OF THE LOCAL TEAM, A HEALTH CARE
PROVIDER OR A LOCAL GOVERNMENT AGENCY SHALL IMMEDIATELY PROVIDE TO
THE LOCAL TEAM ANY RECORDS OF THE HEALTH CARE PROVIDER OR LOCAL
GOVERNMENT AGENCY NECESSARY TO COMPLETE THE REVIEW OF A SPECIFIC
FATALITY, INCLUDING:
(1) HOSPITAL RECORDS;
(2) OUTPATIENT CLINIC, HEALTH CARE PROVIDER, AND
LABORATORY RECORDS;
(3) POLICE INVESTIGATIVE DATA;
(4) MEDICAL EXAMINER INVESTIGATIVE DATA;
(5) CAUSE OF DEATH INFORMATION IN VITAL RECORDS;
(6) SOCIAL SERVICES RECORDS; AND
– 5 –

Ch. 328 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(7) OTHER RECORDS FROM LOCAL OFFICES, AGENCIES, AND
DEPARTMENTS.
(C) THE LOCAL TEAM MAY REQUEST THAT A PERSON WITH DIRECT
KNOWLEDGE OF CIRCUMSTANCES SURROUNDING A FATALITY PROVIDE THE LOCAL
TEAM WITH THE INFORMATION NECESSARY TO COMPLETE REVIEW OF THE
PARTICULAR FATALITY, INCLUDING INFORMATION FROM:
(1) A HEALTH CARE PROVIDER OR STAFF INVOLVED IN THE CARE OF
THE DECEDENT; AND
(2) THE PERSON WHO FIRST RESPONDED TO A REPORT CONCERNING
THE DECEDENT.
5–1107.
A LOCAL TEAM IS A PUBLIC HEALTH AUTHORITY, AS DEFINED IN 45 C.F.R. §
164.501, CONDUCTING PUBLIC HEALTH ACTIVITIES IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE
FEDERAL HEALTH INSURANCE PORTABILITY AND ACCOUNTABILITY ACT.
5–1108.
(A) MEETINGS OF LOCAL TEAMS SHALL BE CLOSED TO THE PUBLIC AND ARE
NOT SUBJECT TO THE MARYLAND OPEN MEETINGS ACT WHEN THE LOCAL TEAMS
ARE DISCUSSING INDIVIDUAL CASES OF SUICIDE.
(B) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBSECTION (C) OF THIS SECTION, MEETINGS
OF LOCAL TEAMS SHALL BE OPEN TO THE PUBLIC AND ARE SUBJECT TO THE
MARYLAND OPEN MEETINGS ACT WHEN THE LOCAL TEAM IS NOT DISCUSSING
INDIVIDUAL CASES OF SUICIDE.
(C) (1) DURING A PUBLIC MEETING, INFORMATION MAY NOT BE
DISCLOSED THAT IDENTIFIES:
(I) A DECEASED INDIVIDUAL;
(II) AN INDIVIDUAL WHO HAS EXPERIENCED SUICIDE OR A
SUICIDE ATTEMPT;
(III) A FAMILY MEMBER, GUARDIAN, OR CARETAKER OF AN
INDIVIDUAL DESCRIBED IN ITEM (I) OR (II) OF THIS PARAGRAPH; OR
– 6 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 328
(IV) AN INDIVIDUAL CONVICTED OF A CRIME OR ADJUDICATED
AS HAVING COMMITTED A DELINQUENT ACT THAT CAUSED A DEATH OR NEAR
FATALITY.
(2) DURING A PUBLIC MEETING, INFORMATION MAY NOT BE
DISCLOSED ABOUT THE INVOLVEMENT OF AN AGENCY WITH:
(I) A DECEASED INDIVIDUAL;
(II) AN INDIVIDUAL WHO HAS EXPERIENCED SUICIDE OR A
SUICIDE ATTEMPT;
(III) A FAMILY MEMBER, GUARDIAN, OR CARETAKER OF A
DECEASED INDIVIDUAL OR OF AN INDIVIDUAL DESCRIBED IN ITEM (I) OR (II) OF THIS
PARAGRAPH; OR
(IV) AN INDIVIDUAL CONVICTED OF A CRIME OR ADJUDICATED
AS HAVING COMMITTED A DELINQUENT ACT THAT CAUSED A DEATH OR NEAR
FATALITY.
(D) THIS SECTION DOES NOT PROHIBIT A LOCAL TEAM FROM REQUESTING
THE ATTENDANCE OF A PERSON WHO HAS INFORMATION RELEVANT TO THE LOCAL
TEAM’S EXERCISE OF ITS PURPOSE AND DUTIES AT A TEAM MEETING.
(E) A PERSON WHO VIOLATES THIS SECTION IS GUILTY OF A MISDEMEANOR
AND ON CONVICTION IS SUBJECT TO A FINE NOT EXCEEDING $500 OR
IMPRISONMENT NOT EXCEEDING 90 DAYS OR BOTH.
5–1105. 5–1109.
(A) EXCEPT AS OTHERWISE PROVIDED IN THIS SECTION, ALL INFORMATION
AND RECORDS ACQUIRED BY A LOCAL TEAM IN THE EXERCISE OF ITS PURPOSE AND
DUTIES UNDER THIS SUBTITLE:
(1) ARE CONFIDENTIAL;
(2) ARE EXEMPT FROM DISCLOSURE UNDER THE MARYLAND PUBLIC
INFORMATION ACT; AND
(3) ARE NOT SUBJECT TO DISCOVERY AND MAY NOT BE INTRODUCED
AS EVIDENCE IN ANY PROCEEDING; AND
– 7 –

Ch. 328 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(3) (4) MAY BE DISCLOSED ONLY AS NECESSARY TO CARRY OUT
THE LOCAL TEAM’S PURPOSE AND DUTIES.
(B) (1) MENTAL HEALTH RECORDS ARE SUBJECT TO THE ADDITIONAL
LIMITATIONS UNDER § 4–307 OF THIS ARTICLE FOR DISCLOSURE OF A MEDICAL
RECORD DEVELOPED PRIMARILY IN CONNECTION WITH THE PROVISION OF MENTAL
HEALTH SERVICES.
(2) SUBSTANCE ABUSE TREATMENT RECORDS ARE SUBJECT TO ANY
ADDITIONAL LIMITATIONS FOR DISCLOSURE OR REDISCLOSURE OF A MEDICAL
RECORD DEVELOPED IN CONNECTION WITH THE PROVISION OF SUBSTANCE ABUSE
TREATMENT SERVICES UNDER STATE LAW, 42 U.S.C. § 290DD–2, OR 42 C.F.R. PART
2.
(C) STATISTICAL COMPILATIONS OF DATA THAT DO NOT CONTAIN ANY
PERSONALLY IDENTIFIABLE INFORMATION INFORMATION THAT WOULD ALLOW THE
IDENTIFICATION OF ANY PERSON TO BE ASCERTAINED ARE PUBLIC RECORDS.
(D) REPORTS OF A LOCAL TEAM THAT DO NOT CONTAIN ANY PERSONALLY
IDENTIFIABLE INFORMATION ARE PUBLIC RECORDS.
(E) EXCEPT AS NECESSARY TO CARRY OUT A LOCAL TEAM’S PURPOSE AND
DUTIES, MEMBERS OF A LOCAL TEAM AND PERSONS ATTENDING A LOCAL TEAM
MEETING MAY NOT DISCLOSE:
(1) ANY PROCEEDING AT A NONPUBLIC MEETING UNDER § 5–1104 §
5–1108 OF THIS SUBTITLE; OR
(2) ANY INFORMATION THAT MAY NOT BE DISCLOSED UNDER THIS
SECTION.
(F) (1) MEMBERS OF A LOCAL TEAM, PERSONS ATTENDING A LOCAL
TEAM MEETING, AND PERSONS WHO PRESENT INFORMATION TO A LOCAL TEAM MAY
NOT BE QUESTIONED IN ANY CIVIL OR CRIMINAL PROCEEDING ABOUT INFORMATION
PRESENTED IN OR OPINIONS FORMED AS A RESULT OF A MEETING.
(2) THIS SUBSECTION DOES NOT PROHIBIT A PERSON FROM
TESTIFYING TO INFORMATION THAT IS OBTAINED INDEPENDENTLY OF A LOCAL
TEAM OR THAT IS PUBLIC INFORMATION.
(G) (1) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION,
INFORMATION, DOCUMENTS, OR RECORDS OF A LOCAL TEAM ARE NOT SUBJECT TO
– 8 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 328
SUBPOENA, DISCOVERY, OR INTRODUCTION INTO EVIDENCE IN ANY CIVIL OR
CRIMINAL PROCEEDING.
(2) INFORMATION, DOCUMENTS, OR RECORDS OTHERWISE
AVAILABLE FROM OTHER SOURCES ARE NOT IMMUNE FROM SUBPOENA, DISCOVERY,
OR INTRODUCTION INTO EVIDENCE THROUGH THOSE SOURCES SOLELY BECAUSE
THEY WERE PRESENTED DURING PROCEEDINGS OF A LOCAL TEAM OR ARE
MAINTAINED BY A LOCAL TEAM.
(H) A PERSON WHO VIOLATES THIS SECTION IS GUILTY OF A MISDEMEANOR
AND ON CONVICTION IS SUBJECT TO A FINE NOT EXCEEDING $500 OR
IMPRISONMENT NOT EXCEEDING 90 DAYS OR BOTH.
5–1110.
THE DEPARTMENT MAY ADOPT REGULATIONS TO CARRY OUT THIS SUBTITLE,
INCLUDING:
(1) PROTOCOLS, PROCEDURES, AND METHODS FOR, AND THE
MANNER AND EXTENT OF INVESTIGATIONS AND REVIEWS BY LOCAL TEAMS;
(2) THE MANNER IN WHICH DATA PROVIDED BY THE DEPARTMENT IS
TO BE STORED AND SECURED;
(3) THE MANNER IN WHICH, AND EXTENT TO WHICH, INFORMATION
BASED ON DATA PROVIDED BY THE DEPARTMENT MAY BE DISSEMINATED.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.
Approved by the Governor, April 28, 2026.
– 9 –